Wisconsin, session 2025, SB978.
do enact as follows:SB978,11Section 1. 100.80 of the statutes is created to read:SB978,2,32100.80 Age-appropriate design for online services accessed by 3minors. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB978,3,24(a) “Algorithmic recommendation system” means a system that uses an 5algorithm to select, filter, and arrange media on a covered business’s website or 1mobile application for the purpose of selecting, recommending, or prioritizing media 2for a user.SB978,3,83(b) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., “biometric data” means data generated 4from the technological processing of an individual’s unique biological, physical, or 5physiological characteristics that allow or confirm the unique identification of the 6individual, including iris or retina scans; fingerprints; facial or hand mapping, 7geometry, or templates; vein patterns; voice prints or vocal biomarkers; and gait or 8personally identifying physical movement or patterns.SB978,3,1292. “Biometric data” does not include a digital or physical photograph; an audio 10or video recording; or any data generated from a digital or physical photograph or 11an audio or video recording unless the data is generated to identify a specific 12individual.SB978,3,1413(c) “Business entity” has the meaning given in s. 13.62 (5) and also includes 14any affiliate, as defined in s. 138.14 (1) (a), of the business entity.SB978,3,1815(d) “Collect,” with respect to data, means buying, renting, gathering, 16obtaining, receiving, or accessing any data by any means, including receiving data 17from the consumer, either actively or passively, or by observing the consumer’s 18behavior.SB978,3,2219(e) “Compulsive use” means a covered minor’s repetitive use of a covered 20business’s online service, product, or feature that materially disrupts one or more 21major life activities of the covered minor, including sleeping, eating, learning, 22reading, concentrating, communicating, or working.SB978,3,2423(f) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., “consumer” means an individual who is a 24resident of this state.SB978,4,112. “Consumer” does not include any of the following:SB978,4,22a. An individual acting in a commercial or employment context.SB978,4,73b. An individual acting as an employee, owner, director, officer, or contractor 4of a business entity, nonprofit organization, or government agency whose 5communications or transactions with a covered business occur solely within the 6context of that individual’s role with the business entity, nonprofit organization, or 7government agency.SB978,4,98(g) “Covered business” means a business entity to which all of the following 9apply:SB978,4,10101. The business entity conducts business in this state.SB978,4,12112. The business entity generates a majority of its annual revenue from online 12services.SB978,4,14133. The business entity’s online services, products, or features are reasonably 14likely to be accessed by a minor.SB978,4,16154. The business entity collects consumers’ personal data or has consumers’ 16personal data collected on its behalf by a processor.SB978,4,18175. The business entity, alone or jointly with others, determines the purposes 18and means of the processing of consumers’ personal data.SB978,4,2019(h) “Covered minor” is a consumer who a covered business actually knows is a 20minor or labels as a minor in accordance with rules promulgated under sub. (7) (b).SB978,4,2221(i) “Default” means a preselected option adopted by a covered business for an 22online service, product, or feature.SB978,5,423(j) “De-identified data” means data that does not identify and cannot 24reasonably be used to infer information about, or otherwise be linked to, an 1identified or identifiable individual or to a device that identifies, is linked to, or is 2reasonably linkable to one or more identified or identifiable individuals in a 3household to the extent a covered business that possesses the data does all of the 4following:SB978,5,751. Takes reasonable measures, including the de-identification requirements 6set forth under 45 CFR 164.514, to ensure that the data cannot be used to reidentify 7the individual and cannot be associated with the individual or device.SB978,5,982. Publicly commits to process the data only in a de-identified fashion and 9does not attempt to reidentify the individual or device.SB978,5,11103. Contractually obligates any recipient of the data to comply with all 11provisions of this section.SB978,5,1512(k) “Derived data” means data that is created by the derivation of information, 13data, assumptions, correlations, inferences, predictions, or conclusions from facts, 14evidence, or another source of information or data about a minor or a minor’s 15device.SB978,5,1616(L) “Genetic data” means any of the following:SB978,5,23171. Any data, regardless of its format, that results from the analysis of a 18biological sample of an individual, or from another source enabling equivalent 19information to be obtained, and concerns genetic material, including 20deoxyribonucleic acids, ribonucleic acids, genes, chromosomes, alleles, genomes, 21alterations or modifications to deoxyribonucleic acids or ribonucleic acids, single 22nucleotide polymorphisms, epigenetic markers, and uninterpreted data that results 23from analysis of a biological sample or other source.SB978,6,212. Any information extrapolated, derived, or inferred from data described in 2subd. 1.SB978,6,43(m) “Government agency” includes any federal, state, tribal, or local 4government entity.SB978,6,85(n) “Identified or identifiable individual” means an individual who can be 6readily identified, directly or indirectly, including by reference to an identifier such 7as a name, an identification number, specific geolocation data, or an online 8identifier.SB978,6,109(o) “Known adult” is a consumer who a covered business actually knows is an 10adult or labels as an adult in accordance with rules promulgated under sub. (7) (b).SB978,6,1111(p) “Minor” means an individual who is less than 18 years of age.SB978,6,1412(q) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., “online service, product, or feature” 13means a digital product that is accessible to the public by means of the Internet, 14including through a website or mobile application.SB978,6,15152. “Online service, product, or feature” does not include any of the following:SB978,6,1616a. Telecommunications service, as defined in 47 USC 153 (53).SB978,6,1717b. A broadband Internet access service, as defined in 47 CFR 54.400.SB978,6,1818c. A physical product.SB978,6,2119(r) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., “personal data” means any information, 20including derived data and unique identifiers, that is linked or reasonably linkable, 21alone or in combination with other information, to any of the following: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb978 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb978 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB978 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB978 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB978: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting